Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.010

Authority for annexation.

Any portion of a county not incorporated as part of a city or town but lying contiguous thereto may become a part of the city or town by annexation. An area proposed to be annexed to a city or town shall be deemed contiguous thereto even though separated by water or tide or shore lands on which no bona fide residence is maintained by any person.

[ 2009 c 402 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.010. Prior: 1959 c 311 s 1; prior: (i) 1937 c 110 s 1; 1907 c 245 s 1; RRS s 8896. (ii) 1945 c 128 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 8909-10.]

NOTES:

Intent—2009 c 402: See note following RCW 35.13.490.

Validation of certain incorporations and annexations—Municipal corporations of the fourth class—1961 ex.s. c 16: See note following RCW 35.21.010.